California statutes. Elections Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 238, Sec. 4.   (SB 851)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

15376.

The elections official shall deliver a duplicate of the certified statement of the result of votes cast to the chairperson of the county central committee of each party.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15377.

(a) The elections official shall identify and provide to the Secretary of State within 31 days of the election the number of vote by mail ballots rejected, categorized according to the reason for the rejection. The Secretary of State shall provide uniform vote by mail ballot rejection reason codes for each category of rejection to be used by elections officials for reporting under this section.

(b) Upon receipt of the information described in subdivision (a), the Secretary of State shall publish a report containing the information for every statewide election, including a recall election for a state constitutional officer, Member of the State Senate, or Member of the State Assembly, and every
 special election to fill a vacancy for the office of Member of the United States Senate, Member of the United States House of Representatives, Member of the State Senate, and Member of the State Assembly on the Secretary of State’s internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 437, Sec. 3.   (AB 3184)   Effective September 22, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Announcement of Results [15400. - 15402.]

15400.

(a) It is the ministerial and nondiscretionary duty of the governing body to declare elected or nominated to each office voted on at each election under its jurisdiction the person having the highest number of votes for that office, or who was elected or nominated under the exceptions noted in Section 15452.

(b) It is the ministerial and nondiscretionary duty of the governing board to declare the results of each election under its jurisdiction as to each measure voted on at the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 238, Sec. 5.   (SB 851)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

15401.

The elections official shall make out and deliver to each person elected or nominated, as declared by the governing body, except those elected to a central committee, a certificate of election or nomination, signed and authenticated by the elections official.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 8, Sec. 15.   (AB 1200)   Effective March 8, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

15402.

(a) Whenever a candidate whose name appears upon the ballot at any election for an office other than a voter-nominated office dies after the 68th day before the election, the votes cast for the deceased candidate shall be counted in determining the results of the election for the office for which the decedent was a candidate. If the deceased candidate receives a majority of the votes cast for the office, he or she shall be considered elected and the office to which he or she was elected shall be vacant at the beginning of the term for which he or she was elected. The vacancy thus created shall be filled in the same manner as if the candidate had died subsequent to taking office for that term.

(b) Whenever a candidate whose name appears on the ballot at any election for a voter-nominated office dies, the votes cast for the deceased candidate shall be counted in determining the results of the election for the office for which the decedent was a candidate. If the deceased candidate receives a majority of the votes cast for the office at the general election, he or she shall be considered elected and the office to which he or she was elected shall be vacant at the beginning of the term for which he or she was elected. The vacancy thus created shall be filled in the same manner as if the candidate had died subsequent to taking office for that term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 3, Sec. 45.   (AB 1413)   Effective February 10, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Determination of Elected or Nominated Candidates [15450. - 15490.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [15450. - 15452.]

15450.

A plurality of the votes given at any election shall constitute a choice where not otherwise directed in the California Constitution, provided that it shall be competent in all charters of cities, counties, or cities and counties framed under the authority of the California Constitution to provide the manner in which their respective elective officers may be elected and to prescribe a higher proportion of the vote therefor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

15451.

The nominees for a voter-nominated office shall be determined in accordance with Section 8141.5 and subdivision (b) of Section 8142.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 1, Sec. 57.   (SB 6)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Operative January 1, 2011, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15452.

The person who receives a plurality of the votes cast for any office is elected or nominated to that office in any election, except:

(a) An election for which different provision is made by any city or county charter.

(b) A municipal election for which different provision is made by the laws under which the city is organized.

(c) The election of local officials in primary elections as specified in Article 8 (commencing with Section 8140) of Part 1 of Division 8.

(d) The nomination of candidates for voter-nominated office at the primary election to
 participate in the general election for that office as specified in Article 8 (commencing with Section 8140) of Part 1 of Division 8.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 1, Sec. 58.   (SB 6)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Operative January 1, 2011, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Democratic Central Committee Conditions for Election of Candidate [15460. - 15460.]

15460.

In each county the number of candidates for membership in a county central committee in each Assembly or supervisorial district who receive the highest number of votes shall be declared elected. However, a candidate for membership shall not be declared elected unless he or she has received votes equal in number to the minimum number of signatures to the nomination paper which would have been required to place his or her name on the direct primary ballot as a candidate for member of a committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Republican Central Committee Conditions for Election of Candidate [15470. - 15470.]

15470.

In each county the number of candidates for membership in a committee in each Assembly or supervisorial district who receive the highest number of votes shall be declared elected. However, a candidate for membership shall not be declared elected unless he or she has received votes equal in number to the minimum number of signatures to the nomination paper which would have been required to place his or her name on the direct primary ballot as a candidate for member of a committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. American Independent Central Committee Conditions for Election of Candidate [15480. - 15480.]

15480.

In each county the number of candidates for membership in a county central committee in each Assembly or supervisor district who receive the highest number of votes shall be declared elected. However, a candidate for membership shall not be declared elected unless he or she has received votes equal in number to the minimum number of signatures to the nomination paper which would have been required to place his or her name on the direct primary ballot as a candidate for member of a committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Peace and Freedom Central Committee Conditions for Election of Candidate [15490. - 15490.]

15490.

In each county the number of candidates for member of central committees to be elected in each central committee election district who receive the highest number of votes shall be declared elected. The names and votes of all nominees for partisan public office qualified for central committees membership pursuant to Section 7755 shall be excluded from the list of candidates for member of central committees and disregarded in the determination of the candidates with the highest number of votes.

No write-in candidate for member of central committees shall be declared elected, however, unless that candidate has received a number of votes equal to or greater than 2 percent of the number of party members voting in the central committee election district at the direct primary, or 20 votes, whichever is less.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Duties of the Secretary of State [15500. - 15505.]

15500.

The Secretary of State, commencing with the first results from the semifinal official canvass received from the elections officials, shall compile the results for the offices and measures listed in Section 15151, which compilation shall be continued without adjournment until completed. The Secretary of State shall immediately make public the results of the compilation as to those offices and measures. The Secretary of State also shall compile and make those results reported pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 15375 available to any person or organization upon request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 18, Sec. 3.   Effective May 4, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15501.

(a) Except as to presidential electors, the Secretary of State shall compile the results for all of the following:

(1) All candidates for statewide office.

(2) All candidates for Assembly, State Senate, Congress, State Board of Equalization, Supreme Court, and Courts of Appeal.

(3) All statewide measures.

(b) The Secretary of State shall prepare, certify, and file a statement of the vote from the compiled results no later than the 38th day after the election. The Secretary of State shall post the certified
 statement of the vote on his or her Internet Web site in a downloadable spreadsheet format that may include, but is not limited to, a comma-separated values file or a tab-separated values file and that is compatible with a spreadsheet software application that is widely used at the time of the posting. The certified statement of the vote shall be posted and maintained on the Secretary of State’s Internet Web site for a period of at least 10 years following the election.

(c) The Secretary of State may gather returns for local elections, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Candidates for county office.

(2) Candidates for city
 office.

(3) Candidates for school and district office.

(4) County ballot measures.

(5) City ballot measures.

(6) School and district ballot measures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 112, Sec. 2.   (AB 813)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

15502.

Within 120 days of the filing of the statement of the vote, the Secretary of State, upon the basis of the information provided, shall compile a supplement to the statement of the vote, showing the number of votes cast in each county, city, Assembly district, senatorial district, congressional district and supervisorial district for each candidate for the offices of presidential elector, Governor, and United States Senator, depending on the offices to be filled, and on each statewide ballot proposition. A copy of this supplement shall be made available, upon request, to any elector of this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

15503.

On the 38th day after the election, or as soon within that time as the returns have been received from the entire state or a congressional district, as the case may be, the Secretary of State shall determine the votes cast for candidates for Senator and Representative and certify to the persons having the highest number of votes for the respective offices as duly elected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 149, Sec. 3.   (AB 1490)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

15504.

The Secretary of State shall make out and deliver, or transmit by mail, a certificate of election or nomination to each person elected or nominated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

15504.5.

Whenever the Secretary of State transmits a certificate of election or unofficial election results to the State Senate or State Assembly regarding a person who appears to have received the plurality of votes in an election for State Senator or State Assembly Member, the Secretary of State shall include a notation in that information, if applicable, that the person was not continuously registered to vote in the district in which the person appears to have received a plurality of votes from the date the candidate filed their declaration of candidacy pursuant to Section 8020 to the date, inclusive, on which the Secretary of State transmits the certificate of
 election or unofficial election results.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 514, Sec. 2.   (AB 63)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

15505.

No later than the 32nd day following the election, the Secretary of State shall analyze the votes given for presidential electors, and certify to the Governor the names of the proper number of persons having the highest number of votes. The Secretary of State shall thereupon issue and transmit to each presidential elector a certificate of election. The certificate shall be accompanied by a notice of the time and place of the meeting of the presidential
 electors and a statement that each presidential elector will be entitled to a per diem allowance and mileage in the amounts specified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 149, Sec. 4.   (AB 1490)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Disposition of Ballots and Supplies by the Elections Official [15550. - 15553.]

15550.

The records and supplies of any election when received by the elections official shall be maintained and disposed of in the manner set forth in this chapter and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17300) of Division 17.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 341, Sec. 1.   (SB 1418)   Effective September 19, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

15551.

(a) If any contest or criminal prosecution has been commenced before its destruction any document or record that is or will be subject to the preservation requirements in Section 17300 to Section 17306, inclusive,
 or
 any certified voting technology or electronic data or portion thereof, including source code, shall be subject to the order of the court in which the contest or criminal prosecution is pending and shall not be destroyed until after final determination of the
 contest or criminal prosecution.

(b) In the case of a congressional election contest, the elections official shall hold the ballots of that congressional district in custody subject to the inspection of any committee of the House of Representatives having in charge the investigation of the contest, until the final determination of the contest by the House of Representatives.

(c) In the case of a contest in the State Legislature, the
 elections official shall hold the ballots of the Senate or Assembly district in custody subject to the inspection of any committee of the Senate or Assembly having in charge the investigation of the contest until the final determination of the contest or the final adjournment of the session of the Legislature in which the contest is filed, whichever is the later.

(d) In no event, except as provided in Sections 15553 or 19230, shall any document that is or will be subject to
 the preservation requirements in Section 17300 to Section 17306, inclusive, or any certified voting technology or electronic data or portion thereof, including source code, or any other election-related material or equipment necessary for the conduct of an
 election, be taken from the custody of the elections official.

(e) For purposes of this section, “certified voting technology” and “electronic data” have the same meaning as defined in Section 17600.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 341, Sec. 2.   (SB 1418)   Effective September 19, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

15553.

(a) In no event shall any individual permit an agent of a law enforcement agency to access, disrupt, modify, or take possession of rosters, combined rosters, or voter lists unless authorized by a court order or to investigate a violation of Section 18560. This subdivision shall not be construed to prohibit an individual, in accordance with a written agreement between the elections official conducting the election and a law enforcement agency pursuant to Section 18544 or Section 18545, to permit agents of that agency to provide logistical, transportation, or security support during the voting period, on election day, or
 during the canvass of the vote.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “law enforcement agency” means all of the following:

(1) Any law enforcement agency, department, or other entity of the state or any political subdivision thereof, that employs any peace officer described in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code.

(2) Any law enforcement agency of another state.

(3) Any federal law enforcement agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 10, Sec. 5.   (SB 73)   Effective May 27, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Recount [15600. - 15649.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [15600. - 15601.]

15600.

Except as provided in this chapter, this chapter applies to all elections. The recount of votes cast for candidates for presidential electors shall be governed by this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

15601.

(a) The Secretary of State, within the Secretary of State’s existing budget, shall adopt regulations no later than January 1, 2008, for each voting system approved for use in the state and specify the procedures for recounting ballots, including vote by mail and provisional ballots, using those voting systems.

(b) No later than January 1, 2018, the Secretary of State shall revise and adopt regulations specifying procedures for recounting ballots, including regulations establishing guidelines for charges a county elections official may impose when conducting a manual recount pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 723, Sec. 1.   (AB 44)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Elections Official-Ordered Recounts [15610. - 15610.]

15610.

If no election contest is pending wherein a recount of the ballots in a precinct has been or will be ordered, the elections official may order that the ballots voted in the precinct be publicly recounted if both of the following apply:

(a) The elections official has reasonable cause to believe the ballots in the precinct have been miscounted.

(b) The elections official has examined, under oath, the precinct board members or, in the case of ballots counted by a central counting system, the counting board members, and they are unable to explain the returns of their respective precincts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Voter-Requested Recounts [15620. - 15634.]

15620.

(a) Following completion of the official canvass, any voter may, within five calendar days thereafter but not later than 5 p.m. on the fifth day, file with the elections official responsible for conducting an election in the county wherein the recount is sought a written request for a recount of the votes cast for candidates for any office, for slates of presidential electors, or for or against any measure, if the office, slate, or measure is not voted on statewide. The request shall specify on behalf of which candidate, slate of electors, or position on a measure (affirmative or negative) it is filed.

(b) If an election is conducted in more than one county, the request for the
 recount may be filed by any voter within five calendar days but not later than 5 p.m. on the fifth day, beginning on the 31st day after the election, with the elections official of, and the recount may be conducted within, any or all of the affected counties.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “completion of the official canvass” shall be presumed to be that time when the elections official signs the certified statement of the results of the election except that, in the case of a city election, if a city council canvasses the returns itself and does not order the elections official to conduct the canvass, “completion of the official canvass” shall be presumed to be that time when the governing body declares the persons elected or the measures approved or defeated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 282, Sec. 2.   (AB 930)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

15621.

(a) Following completion of the official canvass any voter may, within five calendar days beginning on the 31st day after a statewide election, file with the Secretary of State a written request for a recount of the votes cast for candidates for any statewide office or for or against any measure voted on statewide. The request filed pursuant to this section shall specify in which county or counties the recount is sought and shall specify on behalf of which candidate, slate of electors, or position on a measure (affirmative or negative) it is filed.

(b) The Secretary of State shall forthwith send by electronic delivery one copy of the request to the elections official of each county in which a recount of the votes is sought, and the elections official shall confirm
 receipt of the copy in writing by electronic delivery to the Secretary of State.

(c) All the other provisions of this article apply to recounts conducted under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 304, Sec. 10.5.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

15621.5.

If more than one voter requests a recount of the same office or measure pursuant to Section 15620 or 15621, and at least one request is for a manual recount, the county elections official of a county subject to multiple requests as described in this section shall conduct only one manual recount of the ballots subject to recount, the result of which shall be controlling.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 723, Sec. 4.   (AB 44)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

15622.

The request may specify the order in which votes are recounted by precinct or by the batch in which the ballots were scanned. In the case of a recount that includes more than one county, the request may specify the order that counties will conduct the recount within the jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 282, Sec. 4.   (AB 930)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

15623.

Any time during the conduct of a recount and for 24 hours thereafter, any other voter may request the recount of any precincts in an election for the same office, slate of presidential electors, or measure not recounted as a result of the original request.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

15624.

The voter or the campaign committee, as defined in Section 82013 of the Government Code, represented by the voter filing the recount request, or the voter’s designee, shall, before the recount is commenced and at the beginning of each day following, deposit with the elections official a sum as required by the elections official to cover the cost of the recount for that day. The money deposited shall be returned to the depositor if, upon completion of the recount, the candidate, slate of presidential electors, or the position on the measure (affirmative or negative) for which the declaration is filed is found to have received the plurality of votes cast which it had not received according to the official canvass or, in an election where there are two or more candidates, the
 recount results in the candidate for whom the recount was requested appearing on the ballot in a subsequent runoff election or general election who would not have so appeared in the absence of the recount. The depositor shall be entitled to the return of any money deposited in excess of the cost of the recount if the candidate, slate, or position on the measure has not received the plurality of the votes cast or, in an election where there are two or more candidates, the recount does not result in the candidate for whom the recount was requested appearing on the ballot in a subsequent runoff or general election as a result of the recount. Money not required to be refunded shall be deposited in the appropriate public treasury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 282, Sec. 5.   (AB 930)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

15625.

(a) The recount shall be conducted under the supervision of the elections official. The elections official shall convene special recount boards consisting of four individuals appointed by and at the discretion of the elections official. The requester shall reimburse the county for the cost of each member of a recount board.

(b) If an individual appointed to a special recount board is required to tally any ballots as part of their role on the special recount board, that individual shall be eligible to register to vote in this state pursuant to Section 2101. 

 (c) If the office of the
 elections official is the subject of the recount, the governing body shall appoint an officer, other than the elections official, to appoint and supervise the special recount boards. The appointee shall possess demonstrable experience necessary to conduct a machine or manual recount, including, but not limited to, years of experience as an elections official in the state, experience with current voting systems, and knowledge of the voting system’s key functions. This section does not prevent the office of the elections official that is subject to the recount from taking necessary steps to prepare for the recount during the period in which an alternative qualified officer is sought.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 282, Sec. 6.   (AB 930)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

15626.

(a) The recount shall be commenced not more than seven business days following the receipt by the elections official of the request or order for the recount under Section 15620, 15621, or 15645 and shall be continued daily, Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays excepted, for not less than six hours each day until completed.

(b) If the office of the elections official is the subject of the recount, the recount shall commence not more than seven business days following the appointment of an officer in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 15625.

(c) The recount shall not be commenced until the first day following
 notification of the individuals specified in Section 15628.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 282, Sec. 7.   (AB 930)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

15627.

(a) If the votes subject to recount were cast or tabulated by a voting system, the voter requesting the recount shall, for each set of ballots cast or tabulated by a type of voting system, select whether the recount shall be conducted manually, or by means of the voting system used originally. Only one method of recount may be used for all ballots cast or tabulated by the same type of voting system.

(b) (1) If the recount is to be conducted manually and the voting system has the capability to display ballot images, the voter requesting the recount shall select whether the recount shall be conducted by use of paper ballots or the official ballot images.

(2) If more than one voter requests that a recount be conducted manually for the same office or measure, and at least one request is for the recount to be conducted by use of paper ballots, the county elections official of a county subject to multiple requests as described in this subdivision shall conduct only a manual recount of the paper ballots, the result of which shall be controlling.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 282, Sec. 8.   (AB 930)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

15628.

Not less than one day prior to commencement of the recount, the elections official shall post a notice as to the date and place of the recount and shall notify the following persons of it in person, by email, or by any federally regulated overnight mail service:

(a) All candidates for any office the votes for which are to be recounted.

(b) Authorized representatives of presidential candidates to whom electors are pledged, if the votes to be recounted were cast for presidential electors.

(c) Proponents of any initiative or referendum or persons
 filing ballot arguments for or against any initiative, referendum, or measure placed on the ballot by the governing body the votes for which are to be recounted.

(d) The Secretary of State in the case of a recount of the votes cast for candidates for any state office, presidential electors, the House of Representatives of the United States, the Senate of the United States, or delegates to a national convention, or on any state measure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 282, Sec. 9.   (AB 930)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

15629.

The recount shall be conducted publicly.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

15630.

(a) All ballots, whether voted or not, and any other relevant materials, as specified in regulations adopted by the Secretary of State, may be examined as part of any recount if the voter filing the declaration requesting the recount so requests in writing, specifying the relevant materials before the commencement of the recount.

(b) The examination of any ballot shall not include touching or handling the ballot without the express consent of the elections official or the elections officer supervising the special recount board. A ballot shall not be touched or handled during the examination unless the elections official or the elections officer supervising
 the special recount is present to observe the examination.

(c) Except as provided in this section, a ballot shall not be touched or handled by any person during the recount unless that person is the elections official, a person acting at the direction of the elections official, a member of the special recount board, or by order of the superior court.

(d) No part of the voting system in use by the elections office shall be accessed, touched, or handled by any person during the recount unless that person is the elections official or authorized by order of the superior court.

(e) A person shall not photograph or distribute a digital image of any material with personal identifying information of the voter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 282, Sec. 10.   (AB 930)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

15631.

On recount, ballots may be challenged for incompleteness, ambiguity, or other defects, in accordance with the following procedure:

(a) The person challenging the ballot shall state the reason for the challenge.

(b) The official counting the ballot shall count it as the official believes proper and then set it aside with a notation as to how it was counted.

(c) The elections official or appointee pursuant to Section 15625 shall, before the recount is completed, determine whether the challenge is to be allowed. The decision of the elections
 official is final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 282, Sec. 11.   (AB 930)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

15632.

In lieu of the returns as reported in the official canvass, upon completion of the recount showing that a different candidate was nominated or elected, that a different presidential slate of electors received a plurality of the votes, or that a measure was defeated instead of approved or approved instead of defeated, the result of the recount in each precinct affected shall, for all purposes thereafter, be the official returns of those precincts for the office, slates of presidential electors, or measure involved in the recount. If the office, slates of presidential electors, or measure are not voted on statewide, the results of any recount which is not completed by counting the votes in each and every precinct in the jurisdiction within which votes were cast on the
 candidates for the office, on the slates of electors, or on the measure in question shall be declared null and void. If the office, slates of presidential electors, or measure are voted on statewide, the results of any recount will be declared null and void where there is not recounted each vote cast statewide for the office, slates, or measure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 282, Sec. 12.   (AB 930)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

15633.

Not more than one day after the conclusion of the recount, the elections official shall post a copy of the results of any recount conducted pursuant to this chapter conspicuously in the office of the elections official or on the elections official’s internet website for a period of 30 days following the final day of recount activities. The elections official shall notify the following persons of it in person, by email, or by any federally regulated overnight mail service:

(a) All candidates for any office the votes for which were recounted.

(b) Authorized representatives of presidential candidates to whom electors were
 pledged, if the votes recounted were cast for presidential electors.

(c) Proponents of any initiative or referendum or persons filing ballot arguments for or against any initiative, referendum, or measure placed on the ballot by the governing body the votes for which were recounted.

(d) The Secretary of State in the case of a recount of the votes cast for candidates for any state office, presidential electors, the House of Representatives of the United States, the Senate of the United States, or delegates to a national convention, or on any state measure.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 282, Sec. 14.   (AB 930)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

15634.

This chapter does not:

(a) Authorize the opening or recounting of ballots for any precinct except for the purposes specified in this chapter.

(b) Limit other provisions of law regarding an election contest or recount.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Court-Ordered Recounts [15640. - 15642.]

15640.

(a) When requested by the board of supervisors or the grand jury, the district attorney may petition the superior court for an order directing a public recount to be made of ballots tabulated by a voting system in any precincts in the county that it designates for any election occurring not over 25 days before the request. The request and petition shall be made only on one or more of the following grounds, and the order may be issued only with a finding that there is probable cause to believe that one or more of the grounds exist:

(1) Misconduct by anyone sufficient to make it likely that the result of the election was affected as to the successful candidates or propositions or tie holders, including any of the conduct specified in Section 16100.

(2) Errors or failures, whether electronic, mechanical or otherwise, in the safekeeping, handling, tallying, counting, recording, or certification of the ballots or votes cast, sufficient to make it likely that the result of the election was affected as to the successful candidates or propositions or tie holders, or sufficient to cast substantial doubt on the substantial accuracy of the results without regard to affecting any result.

The petition shall be set for hearing and may be opposed by any interested party.

(b) The court may order any further recounts that it may deem proper based on the results of the recounts provided for in subdivision (a) or in Section 15645, and shall declare the results of all the recounts, and shall determine and order corrected the results of any election affected by any recount.

(c) The court may order payment of the costs of any such recount in whole or in just proportion by any person or any public agency, or both, who petition for a recount. In the case of public agencies the costs shall be provided for and paid pursuant to Section 19212.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

15641.

Section 15001 shall apply unless a court orders the program held pending the conclusion of litigation challenging the outcome of an election. If court action or an official recount is initiated while the program is on deposit, the Secretary of State shall make the program available to the court or the elections official in whose jurisdiction the court action or recount takes place, upon written request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 810, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

15642.

Any tape, diskette, cartridge, or other magnetic or electronic storage medium used in the programming of vote totals shall be kept in a secure location and, if there is a recanvass of votes, the officer entrusted with the magnetic storage medium shall submit his or her affidavit stating that they are the true media used in the election and have not been altered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. State-Funded Recounts [15645. - 15649.]

15645.

(a) (1) Within five days after the Secretary of State files a statement of the vote, as required by subdivision (b) of Section 15501, the Governor may order a state-funded manual recount of all votes cast for a statewide office or state ballot measure if any of the following occurs,
 except as provided in paragraph (3):

(A) The official canvass of returns in a statewide primary election shows that the difference in the number of votes received by the second and third place candidates for a statewide office is less than or equal to the lesser of 1,000 votes or 0.00015 of the number of all votes cast for that office except as provided in paragraph (2).

(B) The official canvass of returns in a statewide general election shows that the difference in the number of votes received by the two candidates receiving the greatest number of votes for a statewide office is less than or equal to the lesser of 1,000 votes or 0.00015 of the number of all votes cast for that office.
